Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 8A.322, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3. a. The director shall establish, publish, and enforce rules regulating and restricting the use by the public of the capitol buildings and grounds and of the state laboratories facility in Ankeny. The rules when established shall be posted in conspicuous places about the capitol buildings and grounds House File 2671, p. 2 and the state laboratories facility, as applicable. Any person violating any rule, except a parking regulation, shall be guilty of a simple misdemeanor. b. The rules shall prohibit a person, other than a peace officer, from openly carrying a pistol or revolver in the capitol building and on the grounds surrounding the capitol building including state parking lots and parking garages. However, this subsection paragraph shall not be construed to allow the director to prohibit the lawful carrying, transportation, or possession of any pistol or revolver in the capitol building and on the grounds surrounding the capitol building including state parking lots and parking garages by any person regardless of whether the person has a valid permit to carry weapons. c. A request to hold a public outdoor event on the capitol complex must be submitted to the department by completing an application on the departmentâs internet site. The director shall notify the applicant of approval or denial of the request by a letter to the event sponsor or a memorandum of understanding signed by the director and the event sponsor that specifies the conditions under which the event will take place. The director shall not approve or deny a request based on the number of events an applicant has held or requested to hold on the capitol complex. It is the intent of the general assembly that this paragraph shall not be interpreted as an infringement on the rights guaranteed by Article I, section 20, of the Constitution of the State of Iowa. Sec. 2. Section 8A.367, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . d. For rental or leasing of passenger vehicles operating using an internal combustion engine powered by diesel fuel, that the passenger vehicleâs manufacturer expressly states that the engine is capable of being powered by biodiesel blended fuel classified as B-20 or higher. Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment: The section of this Act amending section 8A.322, subsection 3. Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. The section of this Act enacting House File 2671, p. 3 section 8A.367, subsection 2, paragraph âdâ, applies to contracts issued or renewed under section 8A.367 on or after July 1, 2026. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2671, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor